Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB153.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 205 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Department" means the Department for Medicaid Services; and
(b) "Managed care organization" has the same meaning as in KRS 205.532.
(2) In order to ensure that claims presented by a Medicaid-enrolled provider for
payment by the department or a managed care organization meet the
requirements of state and federal laws and administrative regulations, including
but not limited to medical necessity criteria, a Medicaid-enrolled provider may be
subject to prepayment claims review by the department or a managed care
organization.
(3) A Medicaid-enrolled provider shall only be subjected to prepayment claims review
following:
(a) Receipt of a credible allegation of waste, fraud, or abuse by the department;
(b) Identification of a pattern of uncorrected aberrant billing practices as a
result of an investigation conducted by the department or a managed care
organization;
(c) Failure by the provider to timely, as defined by the department, respond to a
request for reasonable documentation made by the department or a
managed care organization; or
(d) Any other reason established by the department.
(4) (a) A managed care organization may only subject a Medicaid-enrolled
provider to prepayment claims review after:
1. Requesting, in writing, approval from the department to subject a
Medicaid-enrolled provider to prepayment claims review. The written
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1558
request for approval required by this subparagraph shall include a
justification for the request which shall identify the specific provision
of subsection (3) of this section under which the request is being made
and specific facts as may support that justification; and
2. Receiving written approval from the department to subject a provider
to prepayment claims review. The written approval required by this
subparagraph shall include justification for the approval which shall
identify the specific provision of subsection (3) of this section under
which the request was approved, the approved timeframe for which the
Medicaid-enrolled provider may be subject to prepayment claims
review, and the approved scope of the prepayment claims review to
which the provider may be subjected.
(b) Prior to approving any request submitted by a managed care organization
under this subsection, the department shall solicit a response from the
provider against whom the managed care organization is seeking to initiate
prepayment claims review. In soliciting a response from the provider, the
department shall provide the provider with an unredacted and complete
copy of the written request submitted by the managed care organization,
and the provider shall have fifteen (15) calendar days from the date on
which the department solicited a response to respond in writing.
(c) The department shall approve, deny, or return for further information each
request from a managed care organization for prepayment claims review
within fifteen (15) days after it receives a response from the provider or
after the expiration of the fifteen (15) day period in which a provider may
submit a response.
(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection, the department may deny
a managed care organization's request to initiate prepayment claims review
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1558
without soliciting a response from the provider.
(e) The department may require managed care organizations to submit requests
under this subsection in a form and manner prescribed by the department.
(5) Written notice of being subject to prepayment claims review shall be sent by
certified mail, return receipt requested, to the Medicaid-enrolled provider's point
of contact, as set forth in the provider's enrollment agreement, and to the
provider's principal place of business, as it appears on the Secretary of State's
website, if the provider is an entity required to register as a business entity.
Prepayment claims review shall be initiated no less than twenty (20) calendar
days from the date of receipt by the Medicaid-enrolled provider of the written
notice as evidenced by the certified mail return receipt. The notice shall contain
the following:
(a) A copy of the written approval received by the managed care organization
as required under subsection (4) of this section, any additional information
that may be necessary to explain with specific supporting facts the provision
of subsection (3) of section upon which approval was granted, the approved
timeframe for which the Medicaid-enrolled provider may be subject to
prepayment claims review, and the approved scope of the prepayment claims
review to which the provider may be subjected;
(b) A description of the review process and claims processing times;
(c) A description of the specific claims, including specific current procedural
terminology or CPT codes subject to prepayment review;
(d) A detailed list of all supporting documents that the provider will be required
to submit for claims that are subject to prepayment review;
(e) Information on accessing the secure online portal for uploading supporting
documents required under subsection (6) of this section;
(f) The process for submitting claims and supporting documents;
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1558
(g) The standard of evaluation used to determine when a provider's claims will
cease to be subject to prepayment claims review;
(h) Information on requesting a provider education session on the prepayment
claims review process which, if requested by the provider, shall be provided
by the department or the managed care organization that will conduct the
reviews prior to the start of the prepayment claims review; and
(i) Information on the appeals process for both the prepayment review and any
denied claims.
(6) A managed care organization shall allow supporting documents that may be
required for claims that are subject to prepayment claims review to be
electronically uploaded via a secure online portal and shall provide each
Medicaid-enrolled provider who is subject to prepayment claims review access to
that portal. A managed care organization shall not require supporting documents
that may be required for claims that are subject to prepayment claims review to be
submitted by mail, fax, or any other method of transmittal other than a secure
online portal.
(7) The department and managed care organizations shall process all clean claims
submitted for prepayment review within twenty (20) calendar days of receipt of all
required supporting documents for each claim that is subject to prepayment
review. If a provider fails to provide all required supporting documents necessary
to process a claim, the department or managed care organization shall send the
written notice of the missing or deficient documents to the Medicaid-enrolled
provider within fifteen (15) calendar days of the due date of the required
supporting documents, and the department or managed care organization shall
have an additional twenty (20) calendar days to process claims upon receipt of the
previously missing or deficient supporting documents.
(8) (a) A Medicaid-enrolled provider subjected to prepayment claims review shall
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1558
remain subject to prepayment claims review until the provider achieves
three (3) consecutive months with a minimum clean claims rate of at least
seventy percent (70%), provided that the number of claims submitted per
month is no less than fifty percent (50%) of the provider's average monthly
submission of Medicaid claims for the three (3) month period prior to the
provider being subjected to the prepayment claims review process or such
lesser timeframe as may be established by the department in its written
approval provided under subsection (4) of this section.
(b) If a provider submits zero (0) claims for a given month while subject to
prepayment claims review then the clean claims rate shall be zero percent
(0%) for that month.
(c) 1. If a provider fails to achieve a seventy percent (70%) clean claims rate
for three (3) consecutive months within a six (6) month period, the
department may implement sanctions against the provider which may
include continuation of prepayment claims review or other sanctions
as determined appropriate by the department. The department shall
provide adequate advanced notice of any modification, suspension,
termination, or sanction imposed pursuant to this paragraph.
2. Nothing in this paragraph shall be interpreted as authorizing a
managed care organization to impose any sanction or penalty,
including an extension of the prepayment claims review process, on a
Medicaid-enrolled provider for failing to achieve a seventy percent
(70%) clean claims rate for three (3) consecutive months within a six
(6) month period.
(d) In no case shall a Medicaid-enrolled provider be subject to prepayment
claims review for more than twenty-four (24) consecutive months unless the
department has initiated other sanctions against the provider.
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1558
(e) A provider against whom other sanctions have been initiated by the
department may submit a written appeal and request an administrative
hearing to be conducted pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B.
(9) The department and managed care organization shall process and pay claims
submitted for services not subject to prepayment claims review in a timely
manner. This shall include timely payments for all services included on the same
claim as a service that may be subject to prepayment claims review.
(10) For any claim for which the department or a managed care organization has
provided prior authorization, prepayment claims review shall not include review
of the medical necessity for the approved service.
(11) The department shall not require managed care organizations to subject any
predetermined percentage of claims or Medicaid-enrolled providers to
prepayment claims review. A Medicaid-enrolled provider shall only be made
subject to prepayment claims review in accordance with this section.
(12) Any prepayment claims review process to which a Medicaid-enrolled provider
may be subject shall comply with Chapter 3 of the Medicare Provider Integrity
Manual and other applicable guidance from the federal Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services on conducting prepayment claims review.
(13) The department may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A necessary to carry out this section.
Section 2. If the Department for Medicaid Services or the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services determines that a state plan amendment, waiver, or any other form
of authorization or approval from any federal agency is necessary prior to implementation
of Section 1 of this Act for any reason, including the loss of federal funds, the department
or cabinet shall, within 90 days after the effective date of this Act, request any necessary
state plan amendment, waiver, authorization, or approval, and may only delay full
implementation of those provisions for which a state plan amendment, waiver,
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1558
authorization, or approval was deemed necessary until the state plan amendment, waiver,
authorization, or approval is granted or approved.
Section 3. The Department for Medicaid Services or the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services shall, in accordance with KRS 205.525, provide a copy of any state plan
amendment, waiver application, or other request for authorization or approval submitted
pursuant to Section 2 of this Act to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to
the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services and the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue and shall provide an update on the status of any application
or request submitted pursuant to Section 2 of this Act at the request of the Legislative
Research Commission or any committee thereof.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 2/13/2025 12:16 PM Jacketed